Oklahoma, session 2026, SB910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Military


Installation and Critical Infrastructure Protection Act of 2025”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 128.1 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:

Req. No. 1107 Page 2


1. “Agricultural land” shall mean a land area that is either


arable, under permanent crops, or under permanent pastures. Arable


land includes land under temporary crops such as cereals, temporary


meadows for mowing or pasture, land under market or kitchen gardens,


and land temporarily fallow. Land abandoned as a result of shifting


cultivation is excluded. Land under permanent crops is cultivated


with crops that occupy the land for long periods and need not be


replanted after each harvest, such as orchards or vineyards. This


category excludes land under trees grown for wood or timber.


Permanent pasture land is land used for five (5) or more years for


forage, including natural and cultivated crops;


2. “Company” shall mean a for-profit sole proprietorship,


organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture,


limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited


liability company, including a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-


owned subsidiary, parent company, or affiliate of those entities or


business associations, that exists to make a profit; or a nonprofit


organization;


3. “Critical infrastructure” shall mean systems and assets,


whether physical or virtual, so vital to Oklahoma or the United


States that the incapacity or destruction of such systems and assets


would have a debilitating impact on state or national security,


state or national economic security, state or national public


health, or any combination of those matters. A critical

Req. No. 1107 Page 3


infrastructure may be publicly or privately owned and includes, but


is not limited to:


a. gas and oil production, storage, or delivery systems,


b. water supply, refinement, storage, or delivery


systems,


c. telecommunications networks,


d. electrical power delivery systems,


e. emergency services,


f. transportation systems and services, or


g. personal data or otherwise classified information


storage systems, including cybersecurity;


4. “Cybersecurity” shall mean the measures taken to protect a


computer, computer network, computer system, or other technology


infrastructure against unauthorized use or access;


5. “Domicile” shall mean either the country in which a company


is registered, where the affairs of the company are primarily


completed, or where the majority of ownership share is held;


6. “Foreign adversary” shall mean any country designated by the


United States Secretary of State as hostile or a Country of


Particular Concern (CPC);


7. “Foreign principal” shall mean:


a. the government or any official of the government of a


foreign adversary,



Req. No. 1107 Page 4


b. a political party or member of a political party or


any subdivision of a political party of a foreign


adversary,


c. a partnership, association, corporation, organization,


or other combination of persons organized under the


laws of or having its principal place of business in a


foreign adversary, or a subsidiary of such entity, or


owned or controlled wholly or in part by any person,


entity, or collection of persons or entities of a


foreign adversary,


d. any person who is domiciled in a foreign adversary and


is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the


United States, or


e. any person, entity, or collection of persons or


entities, described in subparagraphs a through d of


this paragraph having a controlling interest in a


partnership, association, corporation, organization,


trust, or any other legal entity or subsidiary formed


for the purpose of owning real property;


8. “Military base or installation” shall mean any land,


structure, or property owned or controlled by any division of the


United States Department of Defense, Oklahoma National Guard, or any


other department of government, state or federal, critical to the


safety and security of Oklahoma or the United States;

Req. No. 1107 Page 5


9. “Non-notified transactions” shall mean foreign investments


in the United States that are not voluntarily submitted to the


Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States for review


under 50 U.S.C., Section 4565;


10. “Operational software” shall mean computer programs used


for the operation, control, maneuver or maintenance of state


infrastructure, or any other computer program applications related


to state infrastructure;


11. “Software” shall mean any program or routine, or any set of


one or more programs or routines, which are used or intended for use


to cause one or more computers or pieces of computer related


peripheral equipment, or any combination thereof, to perform a task


or set of tasks, as it relates to state infrastructure;


12. “State infrastructure” shall mean critical infrastructure


and transportation infrastructure; and


13. “Transportation infrastructure” shall include, but not be


limited to:


a. airports including, but not limited to, commercial and


intermodal airports and heliports and all airport


infrastructure,


b. roadways including, but not limited to, publicly


accessible streets, roads, highways, and bridges and


all roadway infrastructure including, but not limited



Req. No. 1107 Page 6


to, signage, toll booths, weigh stations, and traffic


signals,


c. railways including, but not limited to, all classes of


freight rail and passenger rail and all railway


infrastructure including, but not limited to,


intermodal rail yards and signals,


d. ports including, but not limited to, inland ports,


seaports, deepwater ports, inland waterways, and


levees and all port infrastructure including, but not


limited to, intermodal stations, and


e. public transit including bus, ferry, cable car, tram,


trolley, and other types of publicly accessible


transportation and all public transit infrastructure.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 128.2 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A foreign principal from a foreign adversary country may not


directly or indirectly own, have an interest of greater than twenty-


five percent (25%) in, or acquire by purchase, grant, devise, or


descent agricultural land or any interest, except a de minimis


indirect interest, in such land in this state. A foreign principal


has a de minimis indirect interest if any ownership is the result of


the foreign principal’s ownership of registered equities in a



Req. No. 1107 Page 7


publicly traded company owning the land and if the ownership of the


foreign principal in the country is either:


1. Less than five percent (5%) of any class of registered


equities or less than five percent (5%) in the aggregate in multiple


classes of registered equities; or


2. A noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled by a


company that is both registered with the United States Securities


and Exchange Commission as an investment advisor under the


Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended, and is not a foreign


entity.


B. A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns or


otherwise controls agricultural land, as defined in Section 1 of


this act, in this state must sell, transfer, or otherwise divest


itself of the agricultural land within one hundred eighty (180) days


of the effective date of this act.


C. A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns or


acquires agricultural land or any interest in such land in this


state shall register with the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture,


Food, and Forestry within sixty (60) days of the effective date of


this act or the date of acquisition, whichever is latest. The


Department shall establish a form for such registration which, at


minimum, shall include all of the following:


1. The name of the owner of the agricultural land or the owner


of the interest in such land;

Req. No. 1107 Page 8


2. The address of the agricultural land, the parcel


identification number of the property appraiser, and the legal


description of the property; and


3. The number of acres of the agricultural land.


D. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this


section, a foreign principal from a foreign adversary country may


acquire agricultural land on or after the effective date of this act


by devise or descent, through the enforcement of security interests,


or through the collection of debts, provided that the foreign


principal sells, transfers, or otherwise divests itself of the


agricultural land within one hundred eighty (180) days of acquiring


the agricultural land.


E. Any current deeds, contracts, rental agreements, or other


legal agreements in conflict with the provisions of this act shall


be deemed invalid from the date of adoption unless otherwise


provided.


F. The responsibility for determining whether an entity is


subject to the provisions of this section rests solely with the


foreign entity, the Attorney General, any qualifying whistleblower,


and no other individual or entity. An individual or entity who is


not a foreign entity shall not be required to determine or inquire


whether another person or entity is or may be subject to this


section, and shall bear no civil or criminal liability under the


provisions of this section.

Req. No. 1107 Page 9


G. If a foreign principal from a foreign adversary country does


not divest the real property as required by this section, the


Attorney General shall commence an action in district court within


the jurisdiction of the real property.


H. If the real property is held in violation of the provisions


of this section, the district court shall order that the real


property be sold through judicial foreclosure.


I. If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture of land


or other assets held in violation of the provisions of this section,


the whistleblower shall be entitled to a reward equal to thirty


percent (30%) of the proceeds of the land sale that results from the


violation of this section after payments to lienholders. Proceeds


of the sale shall be disbursed in the following order, as


applicable:


1. The payment of authorized costs of the sale, including all


approved fees and expenses of the referee and any taxes and


assessments due;


2. The payment, in an amount approved by the court, to the


Office of the Attorney General for reimbursement of investigation


and litigation costs and expenses;


3. To bona fide lienholders, in their order of priority, except


for liens which under the terms of the sale are to remain on the


property;


4. To whistleblowers; and

Req. No. 1107 Page 10


5. To the restricted foreign entity.


J. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 128.3 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A foreign principal from a foreign adversary country shall


not be allowed to directly or indirectly purchase, hold, rent, or


otherwise control any real property within ten (10) miles of a


military base or installation.


B. A foreign principal that directly or indirectly controls any


real property covered by the provisions of subsection A of this


section, excluding temporary contractual agreements such as rental


or lease agreements, must sell, transfer, or otherwise divest itself


of the property within one hundred eighty (180) days of the


effective date of this act.


C. Any current deeds, contracts, rental agreements, or other


legal agreements in conflict with this law shall be deemed invalid


from the date of adoption unless otherwise provided.


D. If a foreign principal from a foreign adversary country does


not divest the real property as required by the provisions of this


section, the Attorney General shall commence an action in the


district court within the jurisdiction of the real property.



Req. No. 1107 Page 11


E. If the real property is held in violation of the provisions


of this section, the district court shall order that the real


property be sold through judicial foreclosure.


F. If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture of land


or other assets held in violation of the provisions of this section,


the whistleblower shall be entitled to a reward equal to thirty


percent (30%) of the proceeds of the land sale that results from the


violation of the provisions of this section after payments to


lienholders. Proceeds of the sale shall be disbursed in the


following order, as applicable:


1. The payment of authorized costs of the sale, including all


approved fees and expenses of the referee and any taxes and


assessments due;


2. The payment, in an amount approved by the district court, to


the Attorney General for reimbursement of investigation and


litigation costs and expenses;


3. To bona fide lienholders, in their order of priority, except


for liens which under the terms of the sale are to remain on the


property;


4. To whistleblowers; and


5. To the restricted foreign entity.


G. The responsibility for determining whether an entity is


subject to this section rests solely with the foreign entity, the


Attorney General, any qualifying whistleblower, and no other

Req. No. 1107 Page 12


individual or entity. An individual or entity who is not a foreign


entity shall not be required to determine or inquire whether another


person or entity is or may be subject to the provisions of this


section, and shall bear no civil or criminal liability under the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 128.4 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any individual may act as a whistleblower and provide a


referral to the Office of the Attorney General for violations of the


provisions of Section 3 and Section 4 of this act.


B. If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture of land


or other assets held in violation of the provisions of this act, the


whistleblower shall be entitled to a reward equal to thirty percent


(30%) of the proceeds of the land sale that results from violation


of this act.


C. The whistleblower enforcement provision shall take effect


one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this act.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An entity constructing, repairing, operating, or otherwise


having significant access to critical infrastructure may not enter


into an agreement relating to critical infrastructure in this state

Req. No. 1107 Page 13


with a foreign principal from a foreign adversary country, or use


products or services produced by a foreign principal from a foreign


adversary country.


B. A governmental entity may not enter into a contract or other


agreement relating to critical infrastructure in this state with a


company that is a foreign principal from a foreign adversary


country, or use products or services produced by a foreign principal


from a foreign adversary country.


C. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A and B of this


section, an entity or governmental entity may enter into a contract


or agreement relating to critical infrastructure with a foreign


principal from a foreign adversary country or use products or


services produced by a foreign principal from a foreign adversary


country if:


1. There is no other reasonable option for addressing the need


relevant to state critical infrastructure;


2. The contract is preapproved by the Office of the Attorney


General; and


3. Not entering into such a contract or agreement would pose a


greater threat to the state than the threat associated with entering


into the contract.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13002 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1107 Page 14


A. In order to access critical infrastructure, a company must


file a certification form with and pay a certification fee to the


Office of the Attorney General. The Office of the Attorney General


shall prescribe the registration form to be filed pursuant to the


provisions of this section.


B. To maintain registration as a company with access to


critical infrastructure, a company shall:


1. Identify all employee positions in the organization that


have access to critical infrastructure;


2. Before hiring a person described in paragraph 1 of this


subsection, obtain from the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation


or a private vendor criminal history record information relating to


the prospective employee and any other background information


considered necessary by the company or required by the Office of the


Attorney General to protect critical infrastructure from foreign


adversary infiltration or interference;


3. Prohibit foreign nationals from a foreign adversary from


access to critical infrastructure; and


4. Be compliant with the provisions of Section 6 of this act.


C. The Office of the Attorney General shall set the fee in an


amount sufficient to cover the costs of administering the


certification process but not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Dollars


($150.00).



Req. No. 1107 Page 15


D. The Office of the Attorney General shall provide that a


company is compliant with all requirements of this section or revoke


certification.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13003 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. All software used in state infrastructure located within or


serving Oklahoma shall not include any software produced by a


federally banned corporation, nor any software banned at the federal


level.


B. All software used in state infrastructure located within or


serving Oklahoma shall not include any software produced in or by a


foreign adversary, a state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary,


or a company domiciled within a foreign adversary.


C. All software used in state infrastructure in operation


within or serving Oklahoma, to include any state infrastructure


which is not permanently disabled, shall have all software


prohibited by subsection A or B of this section removed and replaced


with software which is not prohibited by subsection A or B of this


section.


D. Any state infrastructure provider that removes,


discontinues, or replaces any prohibited software shall not be


required to obtain any additional permits from any state agency or


political subdivision for the removal, discontinuance, or

Req. No. 1107 Page 16


replacement of such software as long as the state agency or


political subdivision is properly notified of the necessary


replacements and the replacement software is similar to the existing


software.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13004 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Office of the Attorney General shall establish a process


by which local officials, states officials, or other persons may


submit information or concerns to the Office regarding non-notified


transactions in Oklahoma. The Office of the Attorney General may


adopt any necessary rules to implement the provisions of this


subsection.


B. The Office of the Attorney General may submit a memorandum


or report concerning non-notified transactions the Attorney General


has identified in Oklahoma to the Committee on Foreign Investment in


the United States.


C. The Office of the Attorney General shall:


1. Retain a copy of any documents submitted to the Committee on


Foreign Investment in the United States that are included with a


memorandum or report submitted under the provisions of subsection B


of this section; and


2. Notify the Legislature and the Governor as soon as


practicable after submitting a memorandum, report, or other

Req. No. 1107 Page 17


information pursuant to the provisions of subsection B of this


section.


SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1107 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:48 AM







































Req. No. 1107 Page 18